North Dakota, session 69, SB2028.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 6-01-01.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
6-01-01.1. Regulatory fund established - Uses - AppropriationContinuing appropriation.
1. There is created a special fund designated as the financial institutions regulatory fund. The
amounts received under the following chapters, and any other moneys received by the
department of financial institutions, must be deposited into this fund: chapters 6-01, 6-03,
6-05, 6-06, 6-10, 13-04.1, 13-05, 13-08, 13-09.1, 13-10, and 13-11.
2. All moneys deposited in the financial institutions regulatory fund are reserved for use by the
department of financial institutions to defray the expenses of the department in the discharge
of its administrative and regulatory powers and duties as prescribed by law, subject to the
applicable laws relating to the appropriation of state funds and to the deposit and expenditure
of state moneys.
3. All moneys in the financial institutions regulatory fund are appropriated on a continuing basis
to the department of financial institutions to carry out its administrative and regulatory powers
and duties within the limits of an annual or biennial budget approved by the state banking
board and state credit union board.
4. The department of financial institutions is responsible for the proper expendituresexpenditure
of these moneys as provided by law and shall document the revenues and expenditures of the
fund at the time and in the manner required by the office of management and budget.
3.5. Any cash balance in the financial institutions regulatory fund after all current biennium
expenditures are met must be carried forward in the financial institutions regulatory fund for
the next succeeding biennium.
4.6. All moneys derived from the investment of any portion of the financial institutions regulatory
fund must be credited to the fund.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 6-01-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
6-01-04. Powers and duties of the state banking board and state credit union board.
1. The state banking board may adopt rules for the government of financial institutions and trust
companies mentioned in section 6-01-01 to the extent the rules do not conflict with any law of
this state or of the United States. The state banking board shall make and enforce such orders
as are necessary or proper to protect the public and the depositors or creditors of those
financial institutions and trust companies.

S. B. NO. 2028 - PAGE 2
2. The same powers are given to the state credit union board with reference to credit unions as
are granted to the state banking board with reference to financial institutions and trust
companies named in this chapter.
3. The state banking board and state credit union board shall hold a joint meeting to consider
any budget recommendations from the commissioner. Upon consideration of a budget
recommendation, the boards shall approve an annual or biennial budget for the department of
financial institutions, including the number of full-time equivalent positions. A majority of the
members of each board must be present to constitute a quorum for the joint meeting, and
approval by a majority of the members present of each board is required to approve an annual
or biennial budget for the department of financial institutions.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 6-01-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
6-01-10. Commissioner to keep records and make reports - Biennial report - Report to the
legislative assembly.
1. The assistant commissioner shall act as secretary and keep all proper records and files
pertaining to the duties and work of the department of financial institutions and the
proceedings of the board. The commissioner shall report to the board annually, touching on all
the commissioner's official acts and those of the deputy examiners, giving abstracts of
statistics and of the conditions of the various institutions to which the commissioner's duties
relate, and making such recommendations and suggestions as the commissioner may
determine proper.
2. The state banking board shall submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of
state in accordance with section 54-06-04. In addition to any requirements established
pursuant to section 54-06-04, the banking board's report must include a summary or abstract
of the reports of the commissioner.
3. The commissioner shall report to the state credit union board annually in the same manner as
this section provides for the commissioner's report to the state banking board. The state credit
union board shall submit a biennial report to the governor and the secretary of state in
accordance with section 54-06-04, and in addition, the credit union board's report must include
a summary or abstract of the reports of the commissioner.
4. The biennial reports of the state banking board and the state credit union board shall be
published in the form of a combined biennial report of the department of financial institutions.
The biennial report of the department shall be submitted to the governor and the secretary of
state in accordance with section 54-06-04. The biennial report of the department must include
all other biennial reports which the commissioner or the boards are required by law to submit
to the governor and the office of management and budget.
5. The commissioner shall prepare and present a report to the house and senate appropriations
committees of the legislative assembly during each regular legislative session at the time and
in the manner directed by the chairmen of the committees. The report must include a
summary of the department's activities during the current biennium, a statement of the
department's revenues and expenditures for the prior biennium and the current biennium to
date, and any other information requested by the chairmen of the committees.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 6-01-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
6-01-11. Salary of commissioner.
The salary of the commissioner must be within the amount appropriated for salaries by the
legislative assemblybudget approved by the boards. The commissioner is allowed, in addition to the

S. B. NO. 2028 - PAGE 3
commissioner's salary, the commissioner's necessary and actual expenses incurred in the discharge of
the commissioner's official duties within the budget approved by the boards. The commissioner's salary
and expenses must be audited and paid in the manner in which the salary and expenses of other state
officers are paid.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Section 6-01-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
6-01-16. Salaries of commissioner's deputies.
The salary of the assistant commissioner and the salary of each other deputy must be fixed by the
commissioner within the limits of the legislative appropriation for such salariesbudget approved by the
boards. In addition to the amounts herein specified, each deputy must be allowed the deputy's actual
and necessary traveling expenses when engaged in the discharge of the deputy's duties. The salaries
of all clerks, stenographers, and other assistants must be fixed by the commissioner within the limits of
the legislative appropriation thereforbudget approved by the boards.
SECTION 6. EXPIRATION DATE. This Act is effective through June 30, 2029, and after that date is
ineffective.

S. B. NO. 2028 - PAGE 4
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2028.
Senate Vote: Yeas 43 Nays 4 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 59 Nays 34 Absent 1
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State